Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF709.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [181.9741] PROTECTED MEDICAL INFORMATION; GENERALLY. new text end new text begin (a) No employer shall require, demand, or coerce any employee, or impose any condition, incentive, or prerequisite to openly or publicly reveal or display any part of the employee's medical history or health information directly or indirectly through symbols or other indicators. This includes but is not limited to public indication of an employee's vaccination status. new text end new text begin (b) "Employer" means any person having one or more employees in Minnesota, and includes the state and any political subdivisions of the state. new text end new text begin (c) "Employee" means a person who performs services in Minnesota for an employer, and includes independent contractors, unpaid interns, and volunteers. new text end new text begin (d) Any person aggrieved by a violation of this section may bring a civil action in which the court may award $10,000 per violation including reasonable costs and attorney fees. new text end new text begin (e) An employer who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end